Vermont, session 2025-2026, S240.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. chapter 18A is added to read:
CHAPTER 18A. VERMONT HOUSING PRODUCTION REVOLVING
FUND
§ 540. VERMONT HOUSING PRODUCTION REVOLVING FUND
(a) Establishment; purpose. There is created a special fund to be known as
the Vermont Housing Production Revolving Fund, administered by the Office
of the State Treasurer, for the purpose of providing perpetual affordable
housing to households with low and moderate income.
VT LEG #385884 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.240
2026 Page 2 of 9
(b) Funds.
(1) The Vermont Housing Production Revolving Fund shall be funded
by the issuance of bonds, notes, and other obligations as authorized by
subsection (c) of this section.
(2) The Treasurer shall retain payments of principle, interest, and any
fees in the Fund, the amounts of which the Treasurer shall use to issue future
loans through the Fund.
(3) The Treasurer may seek and accept gifts, donations, and grants from
any source, public or private, to be dedicated for deposit into the Fund.
(4) All interest earned on Fund balances shall be credited to the Fund.
(c) Bonds.
(1) The Office of the State Treasurer may issue one-time bonds, notes,
or other obligations in the amount of $50,000,000.00, in fiscal year 2027, to
fund the Vermont Housing Production Revolving Fund.
(2) The funding from the bonds, notes, or other obligations issued under
this subsection shall be for the purposes established in this section.
(d) Project criteria.
(1) The Office of the State Treasurer shall use the funds raised to
purchase or develop multifamily housing units to be administered by the
Vermont Department of Housing and Community Development as outlined in
VT LEG #385884 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.240
2026 Page 3 of 9
3 V.S.A. chapter 47, subchapter 7 that serve households with low and
moderate income into perpetuity.
(2) As used in this section, “households with low and moderate income”
means housing units affordable to a household earning up to 150 percent of the
applicable area median income.
(3) Housing units purchased or developed under this chapter shall be
owned by the State of Vermont.
(e) Loans; eligibility; criteria.
(1) The Office of the State Treasurer shall adopt processes, procedures,
and guidelines to issue proceeds consistent with this section, including a
simple application process that is accessible to developers, builders, and
contractors.
(2) The Office of the State Treasurer shall determine the term and
interest rate of loans issued from the Fund. Interest rates shall not exceed a
rate necessary, when combined with any rents, to pay for the debt service on
the bonds issued to capitalize the Fund.
(3) The Treasurer may adopt one or more mechanisms to provide
enhanced subsidy to incentivize projects, including:
(A) a lower interest rate;
(B) an interest-only option with deferred principal repayment; and
(C) partial loan forgiveness.
VT LEG #385884 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.240
2026 Page 4 of 9
(4) The Treasurer shall use one or more legal mechanisms to ensure that
a subsidized loan for housing remains affordable to a household earning the
applicable percent of area median income as outlined in this section.
(f) Program design.
(1) The Office of the State Treasurer shall consult with stakeholders and
experts in the field prior to issuing funds from the Vermont Housing
Production Revolving Fund.
(2) The Treasurer shall:
(A) develop a streamlined and appropriately scaled application
process;
(B) develop an outreach and education plan, including specific tactics
to reach and support eligible applicants, especially those from underserved
regions or sectors; and
(C) develop an equitable system for distributing investment statewide
on the basis of need according to a system of priorities that includes
consideration of:
(i) geographic distribution;
(ii) community size;
(iii) community economic need; and
(iv) whether an applicant has already received an investment or is
from an applicant in a community that has already received funding.
VT LEG #385884 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.240
2026 Page 5 of 9
(3) The Office of the State Treasurer shall use its best efforts to ensure
that:
(A) investments are targeted to the geographic communities or
regions with the most pressing economic and employment needs; and
(B) the allocation of investments provides equitable access to the
benefits to all eligible geographic areas.
(g) Reports.
(1) The Office of the State Treasurer shall report to the House
Committees on General and Housing and on Appropriations and the Senate
Committees on Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs and on
Appropriations on the status of the Fund annually on or before January 15.
(2) The provisions of 2 V.S.A. § 20(d) (expiration of required reports)
shall not apply to the report to be made under this subsection.
Sec. 2. 3 V.S.A. chapter 47, subchapter 7 is added to read:
Subchapter 7. State-Owned Affordable Housing
§ 2600. STATE-OWNED AFFORDABLE HOUSING
It is the purpose of this subchapter that the Department of Housing and
Community Development administer and manage housing projects purchased
or developed through the Vermont Housing Production Revolving Fund
created by 3 V.S.A. § 540. It is the intent of the General Assembly that units
VT LEG #385884 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.240
2026 Page 6 of 9
administered through this subchapter be forever maintained as affordable
housing in accordance with this subchapter.
§ 2601. POWERS
(a) Powers. The Department of Housing and Community Development
shall have the following powers in carrying out the provisions of this
subchapter:
(1) To prepare, carry out, acquire, lease, and operate housing projects
and to provide for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, alteration, or
repair of any housing project or any part thereof.
(2) To arrange or contract for the furnishing by any person or agency,
public or private, of services, privileges, works, or facilities for, or in
connection with, a housing project or the occupants thereof.
(3) To lease or rent any dwellings, houses, accommodations, lands,
buildings, structures, or facilities embraced in any housing project and to
establish and revise the rents or charges therefore; to own, hold, and improve
real or personal property; to purchase, lease, obtain options upon, acquire by
gift, grant, bequest, devise, or otherwise any real or personal property or any
interest therein; to sell, lease, exchange, transfer, assign, pledge, or dispose of
any real or personal property or any interest therein; to insure or provide for
the insurance of any real or personal property or operation of the Department
against any risk or hazards to procure insurance or guarantees from the federal
VT LEG #385884 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.240
2026 Page 7 of 9
government of the payment of any debts or part thereof, whether or not
incurred by the Department, secured by mortgages on any property included in
any of its housing projects.
(4) Within its area of operation, to investigate into living, dwelling, and
housing conditions and into the means and methods of improving the
conditions.
(5) To manage and operate its housing projects in an efficient manner so
as to enable it to fix the rentals for dwelling accommodations at the lowest
possible rates consistent with providing decent, safe, and sanitary dwelling
accommodations and shall not construct or operate any such project for profit,
or as a source of revenue to the State or municipality. To this end, the
Department shall fix the rental for dwellings in its projects at no higher rate
than it shall find to be necessary in order to produce revenue that, together with
all other available monies, revenues, income, and receipts of the Department
from whatever source derived, will be sufficient:
(A) to pay, as the same become due, the principal and interest on the
bond from the Vermont Housing Production Revolving Fund;
(B) to meet the cost of and to provide for maintaining and operating
the projects, including the cost of any insurance, and the administrative
expenses of the Department related to the projects; and
VT LEG #385884 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.240
2026 Page 8 of 9
(C) to create, during not less than six years immediately succeeding
its issuance of any bonds, a reserve sufficient to meet the largest principal and
interest payments that will be due on such bonds in any one year thereafter and
to maintain such reserve.
(b) Lease terms; rent increases; restrictions.
(1) The Department shall make units available to households earning up
to 150 percent of the applicable area median income. The determination of a
household’s earnings shall occur at the time of initial application. A household
shall not be removed from a unit or denied a subsequent lease due to a
household’s earnings exceeding the thresholds identified in this subdivision
after initial placement within a unit.
(2)(A) The Department shall offer initial and subsequent residential
rental agreements of up to 12 months. Agreements shall be in writing.
Agreements may be renewed at the sole discretion of the tenant.
(B) A tenant may only be removed for failure to pay rent or for
breach of the rental agreement. A tenant shall not be removed for no cause.
(C) Notice and termination shall be provided as required in 9 V.S.A.
chapter 137.
(3)(A) Rent for a given unit shall not exceed 30 percent of a household’s
income.
VT LEG #385884 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.240
2026 Page 9 of 9
(B) An annual increase in rent shall not exceed three percent, unless
the household’s earnings exceed 150 percent of applicable area median
income, in which case, the rent may be increased above three percent. In no
event shall the rent exceed 30 percent of the household’s earnings.
(4) The Department shall prohibit subletting by tenants.
(5) The Department may obtain from the Vermont Crime Information
Center the record of convictions of any person applying for residence in any
housing project administered by the housing authority.
§ 2602. TAXATION
The property of the Department subject to this subchapter is declared to be
public property used for essential public and governmental purposes and such
property shall be exempt from all taxes and special assessments of the State or
any State public body thereof; provided, however, that in lieu of such taxes or
special assessments, the Department may agree to make payments to the State
public body for improvements, services, and facilities furnished by such State
public body for the benefit of the housing project, but in no event shall the
payments exceed the estimated cost to such State public body of the
improvements, services, or facilities to be so furnished.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385884 v.1